test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-atoskahew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskahêw - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm; Wolvengrey p. 401; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 79, 103
  
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskahâw # SET I
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kitatoskahâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nitatoskahânân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahânaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahâwâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nitatoskahâwak # SET I-Pl
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kitatoskahâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nitatoskahânânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahânawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahâwâwak
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kitatoskahin # SET II
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kitatoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kitatoskahinâwâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskahêw # SET III
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: atoskahêwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: atoskahêyiwa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: atoskahimêw # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: atoskahimêwak # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nitatoskahimâwa # SET IV
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kitatoskahimâwa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nitatoskahimânâna
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kitatoskahimânawa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kitatoskahimâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-atoskahâw, nikîatoskahâw] # SET I (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-atoskahâw, kikîatoskahâw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-atoskahânân, nikîatoskahânân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-atoskahânaw, kikîatoskahânaw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-atoskahâwâw, kikîatoskahâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-atoskahâwak, nikîatoskahâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-atoskahâwak, kikîatoskahâwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-atoskahânânak, nikîatoskahânânak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-atoskahânawak, kikîatoskahânawak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-atoskahâwâwak, kikîatoskahâwâwak]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-atoskahin, kikîatoskahin] # SET II (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-atoskahinân, kikîatoskahinân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-atoskahinâwâw, kikîatoskahinâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-atoskahêw, kîtatoskahêw] # SET III (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-atoskahêwak, kîtatoskahêwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-atoskahêyiwa, kîtatoskahêyiwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-atoskahimêw, kîtatoskahimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-atoskahimêwak, kîtatoskahimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-atoskahimâwa, nikîatoskahimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-atoskahimâwa, kikîatoskahimâwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-atoskahimânâna, nikîatoskahimânâna]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-atoskahimânawa, kikîatoskahimânawa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-atoskahimâwâwa, kikîatoskahimâwâwa]
     
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-atoskahâw, niwîatoskahâw] # SET I (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-atoskahâw, kiwîatoskahâw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-atoskahânân, niwîatoskahânân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-atoskahânaw, kiwîatoskahânaw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-atoskahâwâw, kiwîatoskahâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-atoskahâwak, niwîatoskahâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-atoskahâwak, kiwîatoskahâwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-atoskahânânak, niwîatoskahânânak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-atoskahânawak, kiwîatoskahânawak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-atoskahâwâwak, kiwîatoskahâwâwak]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-atoskahin, kiwîatoskahin] # SET II (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-atoskahinân, kiwîatoskahinân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-atoskahinâwâw, kiwîatoskahinâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-atoskahêw, wîtatoskahêw] # SET III (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-atoskahêwak, wîtatoskahêwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-atoskahêyiwa, wîtatoskahêyiwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-atoskahimêw, wîtatoskahimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-atoskahimêwak, wîtatoskahimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-atoskahimâwa, niwîatoskahimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-atoskahimâwa, kiwîatoskahimâwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-atoskahimânâna, niwîatoskahimânâna]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-atoskahimânawa, kiwîatoskahimânawa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-atoskahimâwâwa, kiwîatoskahimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-atoskahâw, nikatatoskahâw] # SET I (Fut+Def)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-atoskahâw, kikatatoskahâw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-atoskahânân, nikatatoskahânân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-atoskahânaw, kikatatoskahânaw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-atoskahâwâw, kikatatoskahâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-atoskahâwak, nikatatoskahâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Def)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-atoskahâwak, kikatatoskahâwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-atoskahânânak, nikatatoskahânânak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-atoskahânawak, kikatatoskahânawak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-atoskahâwâwak, kikatatoskahâwâwak]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-atoskahin, kikatatoskahin] # SET II (Fut+Def)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-atoskahinân, kikatatoskahinân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-atoskahinâwâw, kikatatoskahinâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-atoskahêw, katatoskahêw] # SET III (Fut+Def)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-atoskahêwak, katatoskahêwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-atoskahêyiwa, katatoskahêyiwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-atoskahimêw, katatoskahimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-atoskahimêwak, katatoskahimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-atoskahimâwa, nikatatoskahimâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Def)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-atoskahimâwa, kikatatoskahimâwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-atoskahimânâna, nikatatoskahimânâna]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-atoskahimânawa, kikatatoskahimânawa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-atoskahimâwâwa, kikatatoskahimâwâwa]
     
     
     


     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nitatoskahik  # SET I inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nitatoskahikonân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kitatoskahikonaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nitatoskahikwak # SET I-Pl inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nitatoskahikonânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kitatoskahikonawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâwak
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahitin # SET II inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kitatoskahitinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahitinâwâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: atoskahik # SET III inv (no 5-3 according to Wolvengrey)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: atoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: atoskahikoyiwa
          
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nitatoskahikoyiwa # SET IV inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahikoyiwa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nitatoskahikonâna
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kitatoskahikonawa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâwa
     



     
